Georgia, session 2025_26, SB180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
High Demand Apprenticeship Program, is amended in Code Section 20-4-151, relating to
purpose, employer partnerships, required information, contracts, awards, and limitations, by
revising subsections (b), (d), and (e) and paragraph (2) of subsection (g) as follows:
"(b) An employer sponsor or apprenticeship sponsor may apply to the board for the
opportunity to enter into a contract to perform the requirements of conducting an
apprenticeship program for a specific apprentice. Such contract shall require the employer
S. B. 180
- 1 -

LC 49 2206
sponsor's apprentice or apprenticeship sponsor's apprentice to successfully complete an
apprenticeship program."
"(d) Upon successful completion of the requirements of a contract under this article, the
board shall provide a contract completion award to the employer sponsor or apprenticeship
sponsor. The contract completion award amount shall be determined based on the number
of hours of education and training required for the successful completion of the
apprenticeship under such apprenticeship program but shall not exceed:
(1) $10,000.00 per apprentice for contracts entered into before July 1, 2024; and
(2) $5,000.00 per apprentice for contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2024.
(e) Each employer sponsor or apprenticeship sponsor shall only be eligible to enter into
contracts under this article for up to:
(1) Five apprentices per year through the end of Fiscal Year 2024; and
(2) Ten apprentices per year beginning with the Fiscal Year 2025 and continuing each
fiscal year thereafter."
"(2) Provide funding to award employer sponsors or apprenticeship sponsors up
to $2,500.00 per apprentice 12 months after the start of his or her apprenticeship."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 20-4-154, relating to rules and regulations,
by revising paragraph (4) as follows:
"(4) The terms of agreement between an employer sponsor or apprenticeship sponsor and
the board."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
S. B. 180
- 2 -

LC 49 2206
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 180
- 3 -